Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-11] Statute
of limitations. (a) A claim under this chapter may not be
brought against a person more than four years after that person participated in
the illegal drug market.

(b) The limitation
period provided for in this chapter is tolled during any time there is a
criminal drug offense investigation conducted against the defendant by a
governmental agency or there is a criminal drug offense charge, information, or
indictment pending against defendant. [L 2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next